Colorado statutes. TITLE 28 Military and Veterans
PART 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS

28-3.1-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Colorado Code of Military Justice".

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1162, § 1, effective June 10.

28-3.1-102. Definitions.

As used in this article 3.1, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Accuser" means any person who signs and swears to charges, any person who directs that charges be signed and sworn to by another, and any person who has an interest other than an official interest in the prosecution of the accused.

Repealed.

(2.3) "Cadet" or "candidate" means a person who is enrolled in or attending a state military academy, a regional training institute, or any other formal education program for the purpose of becoming a commissioned or warrant officer in the state military forces.

(2.7) "Classified information" means:

Any information or material that has been determined by an official of the United States or any state pursuant to law, executive order, or regulation to require protection against unauthorized disclosure for reasons of national or state security; and

Any restricted data, as defined in section 11 of the federal "Atomic Energy Act of 1954", 42 U.S.C. sec. 2014 (y).

"Code" means the Colorado code of military justice.

"Commanding officer" means a commissioned officer or warrant officer in a position of command, or a commissioned officer in charge when he or she is administering nonjudicial punishment pursuant to section 28-3.1-114.

"Commissioned officer" means a person who holds the rank of not less than second lieutenant.

"Convening authority" includes, in addition to the person who convened the court, a commissioned officer commanding for the time being or a successor in command.

(6.5) "Dismissal" means a punitive separation that applies only to commissioned officers, commissioned warrant officers, candidates, and cadets and may be adjudged by a general court-martial. A dismissal may be adjudged for any offense for which a commissioned officer, commissioned warrant officer, candidate, or cadet has been found guilty.

"Enlisted member" means any person who is serving in an enlisted grade.

"Grade" means a step or degree in a graduated scale of office or military rank that is established by law or regulation.

"Hostile force" means any person or group of persons acting in violation of the law or opposing the military force in the carrying out of its missions, including but not limited to saboteurs, rioters, and looters.

"Judge advocate" means any commissioned officer who is certified by the state judge advocate general.

(10.5) "Junior enlisted" means an enlisted person holding the rank of E-1 through E-4.

"Legal officer" means any commissioned officer of the state military forces designated to perform legal duties of a command.

"Military" or "military forces" refers to any or all of the state military forces.

"Military court" means a court-martial, a court of inquiry, or a provost court.

"Military judge" means an official of general and special courts-martial detailed in accordance with section 28-3.1-210.

(14.5) "Noncommissioned officer" means an enlisted person holding the rank of E-5 through E-9.

"Officer" means a commissioned or warrant officer.

"Officer candidate" means a cadet of the state officer candidate school.

"President" means the member of the court highest in grade and rank.

"Rank" means order of precedence among members of the state military forces.

(18.4) "Safeguard" means a detachment, guard, or detail posted by a commander for the protection of persons, places, or property of the enemy or of a neutral party affected by the relationship of belligerent forces in their prosecution of war or during circumstances amounting to a state of belligerency, including a written order left by a commander with an enemy subject or posted upon enemy property for the protection of that person or property.

(18.7) "State active duty" means all duty authorized under the constitution and laws of the state of Colorado and all training authorized under Title 32 of the United States Code, as amended.

"State judge advocate general" means the judge advocate general of the state military forces, appointed pursuant to section 28-3.1-106, who is responsible for supervising the administration of military justice in the state military forces and performing such other legal duties as may be required by the adjutant general.

"State military forces" means the National Guard of this state, as defined in section 28-3-101 (12), and any other militia or military forces organized under the laws of the state.

"Superior commissioned officer" means a commissioned officer superior in rank of command.

"Unit training assembly" means an authorized and scheduled training period of not less than four hours duration. Unit training assemblies are authorized pursuant to 32 U.S.C. sec. 502, as amended, and may be conducted with or without pay.

"Warrant officer" means a person who holds the rank of warrant officer one through chief warrant officer five. These persons rank above enlisted personnel and below commissioned officers.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1162, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 2002:

(20) amended, p. 362, § 23, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

IP and (4) amended, (2) repealed, and (2.3), (2.7), (6.5), (10.5), (14.5), (18.4), (18.7), (22), and (23) added, (SB 18-135), ch. 95, p. 740, § 1, effective April 2.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsection (20), see section 1 of chapter 121, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

28-3.1-103. Persons subject to this code.

This code applies to all members of the state military forces.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1163, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1377, § 1, effective April 1.

28-3.1-104. Jurisdiction to try certain personnel.

Any person discharged from the military forces who is later charged with having fraudulently obtained his or her discharge is subject to trial by court-martial on that charge and, after apprehension, shall be subject to this code while in the custody of the military for that trial. Upon conviction of that charge, he or she is subject to trial by court-martial for all offenses under this code committed before the fraudulent discharge.

No person who has deserted from the military forces may be relieved from the jurisdiction of this code by virtue of a separation from any later period of service.

The fact that the enlistment of any person charged with an offense under this code expires while proceedings are pending or while serving a sentence shall not affect the jurisdiction of any court-martial.

Nothing in this code shall preclude applicable federal or state jurisdiction over offenses committed.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1164, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 2002:

(1) amended, p. 602, § 60, effective May 24.

28-3.1-105. Territorial applicability of this code.

This code applies to all persons otherwise subject to this code, either in title 32 of the United States Code, as amended, or state active duty status, while they are serving outside the state and while they are going to and returning from such service outside the state in the same manner and to the same extent as if they were serving inside the state.

Courts-martial and courts of inquiry may be convened and held in units of the military forces while those units are serving outside the state with the same jurisdiction and powers as to persons subject to this code as if the proceedings were held inside the state. Offenses committed outside the state may be tried and punished either inside or outside the state.

This code does not apply to persons serving under title 10 of the United States Code, as amended.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1164, § 1, June 10.

L. 2018:

(1) amended and (3) added, (SB 18-135), ch. 95, p. 741, § 2, effective April 2.

28-3.1-106. State judge advocate general and judge advocates.

The adjutant general shall select and appoint an officer of the military forces as state judge advocate general. To be eligible for such appointment, an officer must be a member of the bar of the state of Colorado for at least five years and must meet the additional requirements for appointment to the state staff as set forth in section 28-3-302.

The adjutant general may appoint as many assistant state judge advocates as he or she considers necessary. To be eligible for appointment, assistant state judge advocates must be officers of the state military forces and members in good standing of the bar of the state of Colorado.

Convening authorities shall at all times communicate directly with their staff judge advocates in matters relating to the administration of military justice. The staff judge advocate of any command is entitled to communicate directly with the staff judge advocate of a superior or subordinate command or with the state judge advocate general.

No person who has acted as a member military judge, trial counsel, assistant trial counsel, defense counsel, assistant defense counsel, or investigating officer in any case or who has been a witness for either the prosecution or defense in any case may later act as staff judge advocate to any reviewing authority upon the same case.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1164, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 2002:

(2) amended, p. 603, § 61, effective May 24.

L. 2018:

(2) amended, (SB 18-135), ch. 95, p. 742, § 3, effective April 2.

28-3.1-107. Apprehension and restraint.

Officers, warrant officers, and enlisted members of the military forces may be placed in arrest by their military superiors upon reasonable belief that an offense in violation of this code has been committed and that the person apprehended committed such offense. An enlisted member may be ordered into arrest or confinement by any commissioned officer by an order, oral or written, delivered in person or through other persons subject to this code or through any person authorized by this code to apprehend persons. A commanding officer may authorize warrant officers or noncommissioned officers to order enlisted members subject to his or her authority into arrest or confinement. A commissioned officer or warrant officer may be ordered apprehended or into arrest or confinement only by a commanding officer to whose authority he or she is subject, by an order, oral or written, delivered in person or by another commissioned officer. The authority to order such persons apprehended or into arrest or confinement may not be delegated. No person may be ordered apprehended or into arrest or confinement except for probable cause. This section does not limit the authority of persons authorized to apprehend offenders to secure the custody of an alleged offender until proper authority may be notified.

If any member of the military forces fails or refuses to report to his or her appointed place of duty, his or her commanding officer is authorized to arrest or cause to be arrested such member and have him or her brought before the commanding officer at his or her unit or organization headquarters, whether such headquarters be located within or without the borders of the state. After such an arrest, the commanding officer is authorized to transport such member to his or her appointed place of duty, whether within or without the borders of the state. If military personnel are not available for the purpose of making the arrest, or if the commanding officer deems it advisable, he or she may issue a warrant to any peace officer authorized to serve warrants of arrest under state criminal law, and such peace officer is authorized and required to serve such warrant in the same manner as other warrants of arrest and make return thereof to the commanding officer issuing the warrant.

If the commanding officer issuing the warrant is unavailable to receive the person arrested, the arresting officer shall take the person before a county court judge in the state. The judge may admit the person arrested to bail by bond, with sufficient sureties and in such sum as he or she deems proper, conditioned upon the person arrested appearing before said judge at a time specified in such bond for his or her surrender to the commanding officer issuing the warrant or to his or her representative. If the person arrested is unable to post bail, he or she shall be committed by the judge to the county jail for a period of time not to exceed three days to await surrender to the commanding officer issuing the warrant or to his or her representative.

Warrants of arrest issued pursuant to this section shall be in the following form:

The fees and mileage allowed for the service of warrants of arrest issued pursuant to this section shall be the same as provided by law for the service of criminal process and shall be paid out of funds appropriated to the office of the adjutant general upon proper application therefor.

STATE OF ________________________)
)
ss.
COUNTY OF ______________________)
To the (Sheriff), (Constable), (Chief of Police) of

(Or the name and rank of the officer, First Sergeant, or N.C.O. ordered to make the arrest) of

County

:

(name of individual to be arrested, rank, serial number)

a member of _________________, Colorado National Guard, having failed or refused
(unit designation)
to report to his or her appointed place of duty at __________________, you are therefore commanded forthwith to arrest the above named _________________________
(name of individual to be arrested)
and bring him or her before me at

.
(unit headquarters)
The arrest is authorized to be made either during the day or at night. Dated at ____________, this ________ day of ______________, 20__.
/s/____________________________
(Type signer's name, rank, branch,
organization, and designation as
commanding officer)

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1165, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 2002:

(1) to (4) amended, p. 603, § 62, effective May 24.

L. 2018:

(1) amended, (SB 18-135), ch. 95, p. 742, § 4, effective April 2.

28-3.1-108. Apprehension of deserters.

Any officer having authority to apprehend offenders under the laws of the United States or of a state, territory, commonwealth, or the District of Columbia may summarily apprehend a deserter from the military forces. If the offender is apprehended outside the state of Colorado, his or her return to Colorado must be in accordance with normal extradition procedure or reciprocal agreement.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1166, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 604, § 63, effective May 24.

28-3.1-109. Restraint of persons charged with offenses.

Any person subject to this code who is charged with an offense under this code may be ordered into arrest or confinement by the convening authority, as circumstances may require; but when charged only with an offense normally tried by a summary court-martial, such person shall not ordinarily be placed in confinement. When any person subject to this code is placed in arrest or confinement prior to trial, immediate steps shall be taken to inform him or her of the specific offense of which he or she is accused and to try him or her or to dismiss the charges and release him or her.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1166, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 604, § 64, effective May 24.

28-3.1-110. Confinement.

Persons confined other than in a guardhouse, whether before, during, or after trial by a military court, shall be confined in a jail in the county where the offense was committed or a jail designated by the convening authority, the costs of such confinement to be paid out of funds appropriated to the office of the adjutant general.

No provost marshal, commander of a guard, or master-at-arms, and no warden, sheriff, keeper, or officer of a city or county jail or any other jail, penitentiary, or prison designated under subsection (1) of this section may refuse to receive or keep any prisoner committed to his or her charge when the committing person furnishes a statement signed by him or her of the offense charged against the prisoner.

Every commander of a guard, every master-at-arms, and every warden, sheriff, keeper, or officer of a city or county jail or of any other jail, penitentiary, or prison designated under subsection (1) of this section to whose charge a prisoner is committed shall, within twenty-four hours after that commitment or as soon as he or she is relieved from guard, report to the commanding officer of the prisoner the name of the prisoner, the offense charged against him or her, and the name of the person who ordered or authorized the commitment.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1166, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 2002:

(2) and (3) amended, p. 605, § 65, effective May 24.

28-3.1-111. Confinement with enemy prisoners prohibited.

No member of the military forces may be placed in confinement in immediate association with enemy prisoners.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1167, § 1, effective June 10.

28-3.1-112. Punishment prohibited before trial.

Subject to section 28-3.1-403, no person, while being held for trial, may be subjected to punishment or penalty other than arrest or confinement upon the charges pending against such person, nor shall the arrest or confinement imposed upon such person be any more rigorous than the circumstances require to insure his or her presence. However, such person may be subjected to minor punishment during that period for infractions of discipline.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1167, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 605, § 66, effective May 24.

28-3.1-113. Delivery of offenders to civil authorities.

Under such regulations as are prescribed under this code, a person subject to this code who is on state active duty who is accused of any offense against civil authority may be delivered, upon request, to the civil authority for trial.

When delivery under this section is made to any civil authority of a person undergoing sentence of a court-martial and the delivery interrupts the execution of the sentence of the court-martial, the offender after having answered to the civil authorities for his or her offense shall, upon the request of competent military authority, be returned to military custody for the completion of his or her sentence.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1167, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 2002:

(2) amended, p. 605, § 67, effective May 24.

L. 2018:

(1) amended, (SB 18-135), ch. 95, p. 742, § 5, effective April 2.

28-3.1-114. Commanding officer's nonjudicial punishment.

Punishment may be imposed for any offense cognizable by a court-martial upon any member of the state military forces under this section. Under such regulations as the governor may prescribe, limitations may be placed on the powers granted by this section with respect to the kind and amount of punishment authorized and the levels of commanding officers and warrant officers exercising command authorized to exercise those powers. If authorized by regulations of the governor, the governor or an officer of general rank in command may delegate his or her powers under this section to a principal assistant. If subject to disciplinary punishment, the accused must be afforded the opportunity to be represented by defense counsel having the qualifications prescribed under section 28-3.1-102 (10), if available. Otherwise, the accused must be afforded the opportunity to be represented by any available commissioned officer of his or her choice. The accused may also employ civilian counsel of his or her own choosing at his or her own expense. In all proceedings, the accused is allowed three duty days, or longer on written justification, to reply to the notification of intent to impose punishment under this section.

Subject to subsection (1) of this section, any commanding officer may, in addition to or in lieu of admonition or reprimand, impose one or more of the following disciplinary punishments without the intervention of a court-martial:

Upon an officer of his or her command:

Withholding of privileges for not more than two weeks, which need not be consecutive;

Restriction to certain specified limits, with or without suspension from duty, for not more than two weeks, which need not be consecutive;

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (2)(a)(III) is effective until notice to the revisor of statutes that the Space National Guard is created is received. See editor's note following this section.] If imposed by the governor, the adjutant general, or a commanding officer of the Army or National Guard, a fine or forfeiture of pay and allowance of not more than the amount of pay and allowance received for two unit training assemblies or two days of annual training, whichever is applicable according to duty status;

(III)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (2)(a)(III) is effective upon notice to the revisor of statutes that the Space National Guard is created. See editor's note following this section.

]

If imposed by the governor, the adjutant general, or a commanding officer of the Army National Guard, Air National Guard, or Space National Guard, a fine or forfeiture of pay and allowance of not more than the amount of pay and allowance received for two unit training assemblies or two days of annual training, whichever is applicable according to duty status;

An admonition; or

A reprimand;

Upon other military personnel of his or her command:

Withholding of privileges for not more than two weeks, which need not be consecutive;

Restriction to certain specified limits, with or without suspension from duty, for not more than two weeks, which need not be consecutive;

Extra duties for not more than fourteen days, which need not be consecutive, and for not more than two hours per day, holidays included;

Reduction to next inferior grade if the grade from which he or she was demoted was established by the command or an equivalent or lower command; or

A fine of any amount up to the maximum pay and allowances received for two unit training assemblies or two days of annual training, whichever is applicable according to duty status.

(2.5) If the commanding officer is of field grade, grade of O-4 or rank of major or above, he or she may impose on an enlisted member any one or a combination of the following disciplinary punishments without the intervention of a court-martial:

Any of the punishments stated in subsections (2)(b)(I) to (2)(b)(III) of this section;

A fine of any amount up to the maximum pay and allowances received for two unit training assemblies or two days of annual training, whichever is applicable according to duty status;

Reduction to the lowest or any intermediate pay grade, if the current grade from which he or she is demoted is within the promotion authority of the officer imposing the reduction or an officer subordinate to the one imposing the reduction, but enlisted members in military grades above E-4 may not be reduced by more than two military grades.

The governor may, by regulation, place limitations on the powers granted by this section with respect to the kind and amount of punishment authorized and the levels of commanding officers and warrant officers exercising command authorized to exercise those powers.

An officer in charge may, for minor offenses, impose on enlisted members assigned to the unit of which he or she is in charge, the punishments authorized to be imposed by commanding officers.

(4.4) Maximum allowable punishments of withholding of privileges, restrictions, and extra duties may not be combined to run consecutively.

(4.7) The officer who imposes the punishment pursuant to this section, or the successor in command, may, at any time, suspend, set aside, mitigate, or remit any part or amount of the punishment and restore all rights, privileges, and property affected. The officer also may:

Mitigate reduction in grade to forfeiture of pay;

Mitigate arrest in quarters to restriction; or

Mitigate extra duties to restriction.

Except where punishment has been imposed by the governor, a person punished under this section who considers such punishment unjust or disproportionate to the offense may, through the proper channel, appeal to the next superior authority. The appeal shall be promptly forwarded and decided, but the person punished may in the meantime be required to undergo the punishment adjudged. The officer who imposes the punishment, his or her successor in command, and superior authority may suspend, set aside, or remit any part or amount of the punishment and restore all rights, privileges, and property affected.

The imposition and enforcement of disciplinary punishment under this section for any act or omission is not a bar to trial by court-martial for a serious crime or offense growing out of the same act or omission and not properly punishable under this section; but the fact that disciplinary punishment has been enforced may be shown by the accused upon trial and when so shown shall be considered in determining the measure of punishment to be adjudged in the event of a finding of guilty.

Whenever a punishment of forfeiture of pay and allowances is imposed under this section, the forfeiture may apply to pay or allowances accruing on and after the date that punishment is imposed and to pay and allowances accrued before that date.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1167, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 86:

(1) and (2)(b)(V) amended, p. 1014, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(2)(b)(V) amended, p. 1377, § 2, effective April 1.

L. 2002:

(1), IP(2)(a), IP(2)(b), (2)(b)(IV), (4), and (5) amended, p. 605, § 68, effective May 24.

L. 2018:

(1), IP(2), (2)(a), (2)(b)(I), (2)(b)(II), (2)(b)(IV), (2)(b)(V), and (3) amended and (2.5), (4.4), and (4.7) added, (SB 18-135), ch. 95, p. 742, § 6, effective April 2.

L. 2021:

(2)(a)(III) amended, (HB 21-1231), ch. 206, p. 1078, § 7, effective (see editor's note).

Editor's note:

Section 15(2) of chapter 206 (HB 21-1231), Session Laws of Colorado 2021, provides that changes to subsection (2)(a)(III) take effect only if the federal government creates the Space National Guard in the "FY 2022 National Defense Authorization Act" and take effect on the date identified in the written notice from the resource and legislative director of the department of military and veterans affairs to the revisor of statutes, as required in section 28-5-703.5, that the Space National Guard was created or, if the notice does not specify that date, on the date of the notice to the revisor of statutes, or on May 28, 2021, whichever is later. As of publication date, the revisor of statutes had not received the written notice